Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Retirement Allowances, Disability Benefits, Spouses’ Benefits

47-2-120.
Retirement allowances.

Upon service retirement, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance which shall consist of:

An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated contributions at the time of his or her retirement; and

A pension equal to the annuity allowable at age of retirement, but not to exceed an annuity which would have been allowed at age 65, which pension shall be computed on the basis of his or her contributions made prior to attaining age 65, provided that any member may continue his or her contributions after attaining 65 years of age, and by so doing shall receive membership service credit for such period of time, which shall be used in the computation of retirement allowances.

No person who at any time elected nonmembership shall establish, nor shall any person who transferred to the retirement system or who previously became a member shall increase, the pension set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section by reason of his employment in or transfer to another employer. No member shall be eligible for that pension unless at least 30 days of his prior service was earned within an 18 month period immediately preceding his date of membership.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any member with 30 years of service, regardless of age, shall be eligible to retire forthwith and, upon retirement, shall be paid not less than the service retirement allowance which would have been payable to such member upon service retirement at age 65 with 30 years of service.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any member whose current membership began prior to July 1, 1982, and who has at least 34 years of service shall be eligible to retire forthwith and upon retirement shall be paid not less than the service retirement allowance which would have been payable upon service retirement at the age of 65 had the member continued in service without further change in compensation.

In the case of any member who has at least 25 but less than 30 years of creditable service and who has not reached the age of 60 years upon retirement, the service allowance set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be reduced by an actuarial equivalent certified by the board of trustees. Such reduced amount shall take into consideration the member’s age and number of years of creditable service at the time of retirement and shall be sufficient to permit retirement at such age or with such number of years of creditable service without creating any accrued liability against the retirement system. Such reduction shall not apply in calculating the service allowance for disability retirement or death. Any member who retires with less than 30 years of creditable service or who has not obtained the age of 60 at the time of retirement shall not become eligible for postretirement benefit adjustments until such time as the member reaches the age of 60 or would have obtained 30 years of creditable service, whichever occurs earlier.

The board of trustees shall cause the actuary for the retirement system to calculate the actuarial cost to the retirement system of any salary increase granted to a member in excess of 5 percent over the 12 months immediately prior to such member’s retirement date and shall notify the employing unit of such amount. Such notice shall be sent not later than 60 days following such member’s retirement date. The employing unit shall pay such amount, together with the cost of such actuarial calculation, as a supplemental employer contribution to the board of trustees not later than the last day of the month following receipt of such notice.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 5; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 349, § 4; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 160, § 4; Ga. L. 1957, p. 465, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1177, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1096, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1652, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1874, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 154, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 322, § 1/HB 476; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 18/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 18/SB 436.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, added subsection (f). The second 2009 amendment, effective May 11, 2009, in subsection (d), substituted “whose current membership began prior to July 1, 1982, and who has” for “with” and substituted “the member” for “he”.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (a), inserted “or her” throughout, added “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(1), substituted a period for “; and” at the end of paragraph (a)(2), and deleted former paragraph (a)(3), which read: “If he has a prior service certificate in full force and effect, an additional pension which shall be equal to the annuity allowable at age of retirement, provided that such pension does not exceed the annuity which would have been allowable at age 65 by more than twice the amount of his prior service accumulations as defined in Code Section 47-2-96 with regular interest on such amount as from time to time in effect, which interest shall be figured from the date of establishment until the earlier of the date of his retirement or the date on which he attains 65 years of age.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1874, § 1, amending subsection (a) of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by Code Section 47-20-50 and, therefore, did not become law and was repealed on July 1, 1994. See the state auditor’s report, the final item in the Georgia Laws 1994.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-121.
Optional retirement allowances.

A member may elect to convert the retirement allowance otherwise payable to him or her into a modified retirement allowance of equivalent actuarial value in accordance with one of the options set forth in subsections (b) through (e) of this Code section; provided, however, that the member may only make such election after he or she has become eligible to retire and before the first payment of his or her retirement allowance normally becomes due; provided, further, that if a member was or is unmarried at the time he or she retires and subsequently marries, such member may make such election not later than December 31, 1998, or within six months after the date of marriage, whichever date is later. If a member with a named living beneficiary dies or is determined to be mentally incompetent after becoming eligible to retire, his or her election, or option two in the absence of such election, shall be effective.

Option one shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance which is payable during the life of the retired member, with the provision that if he dies before he has received in payments of his annuity the amount of his accumulated contributions at the time of his retirement, the balance of such amount shall be paid to the person, if any, nominated by him by written designation duly executed and filed with the board of trustees; otherwise such amount shall be paid to the retired member’s estate.

Option two shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance which is payable during the life of the retired member and which, upon his death, shall be continued at the same rate throughout the life of and paid to the person nominated by him by written designation duly executed and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his retirement.

Option three shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance which is payable during the life of the retired member and which, upon his death, shall be continued at the rate of one-half the reduced retirement allowance throughout the life of and paid to the person nominated by him by written designation duly executed and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his retirement.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, until the first payment of any member’s retirement allowance becomes payable and upon approval of the board of trustees, the member shall have the option, which shall be known as option four, to elect to convert his retirement allowance into any method of payments which he may deem necessary. Those payments shall be paid either to the member or, at his election, to any designated person, to the estate of the member, or to the estate of any designated person. Monthly payments under this option which are in excess of the member’s monthly retirement allowance when computed without option shall be payable only for a period not to exceed five continuous years from the date of the first payment; and such monthly payments shall not exceed 135 percent of the member’s monthly retirement allowance, when computed without option. Except in cases where years certain payments have been established for the member, no monthly allowance shall be payable to the beneficiary in an amount greater than the monthly allowance which would have been payable to the member’s beneficiary under option two.

(e.1)

When option two or three is elected and the spouse or child of the retired member who qualifies as a dependent under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 is the person designated to receive all amounts and benefits upon the death of the retired member, option five shall consist of the added provision that in the event the spouse or dependent child predeceases the retired member, the retirement allowance payable to the retired member after the death of the spouse or dependent child shall be equal to the maximum retirement allowance which the retired member would have been entitled to receive under this chapter.

(e.2) (1)

As used in this subsection, the term “retired member” means a person retired under this chapter who elected an optional allowance under this Code section with the spouse designated as the person to receive all amounts upon the death of the retired member.

(e.3) (1)

As used in this subsection, the term “retired member” means a person retired under this chapter who elected an optional allowance under this Code section with a child who qualifies as a dependent under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 designated as the person to receive all amounts upon the death of the retired member.

(e.4)

Option six shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance together with a partial lump sum distribution. This option may be elected by any retiring member including members electing another optional allowance under this Code section except that this option shall not be available to members retiring pursuant to Code Section 47-2-123 or members subject to the requirements of subsection (e) of Code Section 47-2-120. The amount of the lump sum distribution under this subsection may not exceed the sum of 36 months of the monthly retirement allowance the retiring member would have received had he or she not elected the partial lump sum option. The partial lump sum distribution will be made as a single payment payable at the time the first monthly retirement allowance is paid to the retired member.

Any provisions of this Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, any member who has elected option three may waive the payment of one-half of the reduced retirement allowance payable to the person nominated by the member by filing a written declaration of waiver with the board of trustees. The waiver of such payments to the person nominated shall not affect or increase the reduced retirement allowance payable during the life of the retired member, but such waiver shall merely act as a forfeiture of those allowances which would otherwise have been payable to the person nominated by the retired member.

Any other provisions of this Code section or of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the board of trustees may, by rule or regulation, require that when a member or a retired member dies and the beneficiary is a person other than the surviving spouse of the member, the benefits payable to the beneficiary shall be paid to the beneficiary within a definite time period immediately following the death of the member or retired member.

Whenever any retired member has elected an optional allowance under this Code section and the spouse is the person designated to receive all amounts and benefits upon the death of the retired member, the retired member may revoke the election at any time after the entry of a final judgment of complete divorce from the spouse so nominated or the retired member may elect to continue the optional allowance with the former spouse designated to receive all amounts and benefits upon the death of the retired member. Upon any such revocation or upon the death of the spouse of a retired member who had elected option five, the retired member may elect to begin receiving the maximum retirement allowance which the retired member would have been entitled to receive under this chapter. In the event any such retired member remarries after divorce from the former spouse and the former spouse was not continued as a beneficiary under the optional allowance after the divorce, the retired member may elect to begin receiving the applicable actuarially reduced retirement benefit of equivalent actuarial value and reestablish on behalf of the new spouse the same option which was applicable to the former spouse, but such option on behalf of the new spouse may not be reestablished until one year after the date of remarriage or until a child of the remarried couple is born, whichever is earlier.

Whenever any retired member was unmarried at the time of retirement and he or she has elected an optional allowance under this Code section and has named a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries to receive all amounts and benefits upon the death of the retired member, the retired member may revoke the election at any time after the member marries or remarries and designate the current spouse as the person to receive all amounts and benefits upon the death of the retired member. In such event, the member shall receive the applicable actuarially reduced retirement benefit of equivalent actuarial value and establish on behalf of the new spouse optional allowance two, three, four, or five, as provided in this Code section. Upon the death of such spouse or upon the entry of a final order of divorce, the provisions of subsection (h) of this Code section shall become applicable.

Upon the death of the retired member and then the death of the person designated to receive continuing retirement benefits under option two, three, four, or five, if the total monthly benefits paid to the retired member and to such person designated to receive continuing benefits, including any partial lump-sum distribution, do not equal or exceed the retired member’s accumulated contributions at the time of his or her retirement, the difference shall be refunded to the person designated in writing by the retired member to receive such a refund of this difference. If no such person is designated to receive a refund of this difference, or if such designated person has predeceased the person designated to receive continuing monthly retirement benefits, or if such designees are the same person, this difference shall be paid to the estate of the person designated to receive continuing monthly retirement benefits.

Upon the death of the person designated by the retired member to receive continuing monthly retirement benefits under option two, three, four, five, or six and then the death of the retired member, if the total monthly benefits paid to the retired member prior to his or her death, including any partial lump-sum distribution, do not equal or exceed the retired member’s accumulated contributions at the time of his or her retirement, the difference shall be refunded to the person designated in writing by the retired member to receive such a refund of this difference. If the person designated by the retired member to receive a refund of this difference also predeceases the retired member, or if such designees are the same person, or if no person is designated to receive a refund of this difference, this difference shall be paid to the estate of the retired member.

(2)

In the event a designated spouse predeceases a retired member and the retired member subsequently remarries, the retired member may elect to begin receiving an actuarially reduced benefit of equivalent value and reestablish on behalf of the new spouse the same option which was applicable to the deceased former spouse, but such option on behalf of the new spouse may not be reestablished until one year after the date of remarriage or until a child of the remarried couple is born, whichever is earlier.

(3)

This subsection applies to retired members who retired at any time prior to July 1, 1992, as well as to those who retire on or after that date, and it is specifically provided that the election of option five under subsection (e.1) of this Code section is not necessary for the purposes of this subsection.

(2)

In the event a designated dependent child predeceases a retired member and the retired member is married or subsequently marries, the retired member may elect to begin receiving an actuarially reduced benefit of equivalent value and reestablish on behalf of the spouse the same option which was applicable to the deceased dependent child, but such option on behalf of the spouse may not be reestablished until one year after the date of the death of the dependent child or, in the case of the remarriage of the retired member, one year after the date the retired member remarries.

(3)

This subsection applies to retired members who retired at any time prior to July 1, 1996, as well as to those who retire on or after that date.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 5; Ga. L. 1957, p. 172, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 283, § 7; Ga. L. 1959, p. 107, § 5; Ga. L. 1961, p. 143, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 247, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 810, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 636, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1141, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1248, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 153, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 580, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 588, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 46, § 1/HB 178; Ga. L. 2005, p. 52, § 1/HB 381.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, subsection (i) as added by Ga. L. 2004, p. 588, § 2 was redesignated as subsection (j).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 2975, adding subsection (e.2) and amending subsection (h) of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by Code Section 47-20-50 and, therefore, did not become law and became repealed on July 1, 1992. Ga. L. 1992, p. 1141, §§ 1 and 2, also adding subsection (e.2) and amending subsection (h) of this Code section, was funded.
See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1992, p. CDV.

47-2-122.
Vesting of rights to a retirement allowance despite early retirement; retirement allowance payable to such persons.

Except as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member’s accumulated contributions shall be 100 percent vested and nonforfeitable at all times. The right to a service retirement allowance under this chapter shall vest in any member who withdraws from service with at least ten years of membership service subsequent to January 1, 1954, although the member has not yet attained 60 years of age, provided that the member has not withdrawn the member’s contributions. Such member shall become entitled to a service retirement allowance (1) upon filing an application as provided in Code Section 47-2-110 and (2) upon attaining the age of 60 or, at the member’s option, at any time subsequent thereto after filing such application. The retirement allowance in the case of any such member shall be the monthly amount the member would have received had the member retired on the last day the member contributed to the retirement system and at that time had been the same age as when the member actually retired. If a member with vested rights dies before reaching age 60, the member’s accumulated contributions shall be paid to the member’s named living beneficiary, otherwise to the member’s estate.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 394, § 8; Ga. L. 1963, p. 42, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 360, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 19/HB 202.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, added the first sentence; and, throughout this Code section, substituted “the member” for “he” and substituted “the member’s” for “his”.